Utah statutes.
57-17-1.   Return or explanation of retainage upon termination of tenancy.
Owners or designated agents requiring deposits however denominated from
renters leasing or renting residential dwelling units shall either return
those deposits at the termination of the tenancy or provide the renter with
written notice explaining why any deposit refundable under the terms of the
lease or rental agreement is being retained.
